Hawaii, session 2025, GM1284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. There is appropriated out of the general
2 revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $76,500 or so much
3 thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
4 same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
5 2026-2027 to:
6 (1) Support the coffee and orchard crops extension and
7 applied research program;
8 (2) Support the Kona research station in the county of
9 Hawaii; and
10 (3) Fund the establishment of one full-time equivalent
11 (1.0 FTE) permanent extension agent position within
12 the university of Hawaii college of tropical
13 agriculture and human resilience's Kona cooperative
14 extension.
IS The sums appropriated shall be expended by the agribusiness
16 development corporation for the purposes of this Act.
17 SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-2838 SB865 CDl SMA-3.docx
IIHiflUllllllllinillliil^B

865
S.B. NO
O
T
O
Q
Q
Q
, 2025

S.B. No. 865, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai'i, Regular Session of 2025.
194

SB No. 865, SD1,HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives